District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.22

Contributions to inaugural committees.

No person, including a business contributor, may make any contribution to or for an inaugural committee, and the Mayor or Mayor-elect shall not receive any contribution to or for an inaugural committee from any person, that when aggregated with all other contributions to or for the inaugural committee received from such person, exceeds $10,000 in an aggregate amount; provided, that the $10,000 limitation shall not apply to contributions made by the Mayor or Mayor-elect for the purpose of funding his or her own inaugural committee within the District.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 322, 59 DCR 1862
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-79, § 2(n), 61 DCR 153

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-79 rewrote this section.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-79: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-79 provided that the act shall apply upon the latest of: (1) The inclusion of the fiscal effect of the act in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register; or (2) January 31, 2015.

A certification dated February 4, 2015, that the fiscal effect of the Campaign Finance Reform and Transparency Amendment Act of 2013, D.C. Law 20-79, has been included in an approved budget and financial plan was published in the D.C. Register on March 13, 2015 (62 DCR 2988).